xinruyan/swahili1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N
+Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
+N:0 Noun;

LEXICON Noun
+Sg:u Add;
+Sg:w Add;
+Pl:m Add;
+Pl:ŋ Add;
+Pl:n Add;
+Pl:ɲ Add;
+Pl:0 Add;

LEXICON Add
+:0 Stem;

LEXICON Stem
bao #;
bawa #;
devu #;
gwe #;
wati #;
wanda #;
wiŋgu #;
limi #;
paŋga #;
pindi #;
tambi #;
tepe #;
kuta #;
kuni #;
kut⁀ʃa #;
fuŋguo #;
fagio #;
fizi #;
vumbi #;
siku #;
ʃaŋga #;
akati #;
avu #;
ajo #;
embe #;
imbo #;
